Indiana, session 2026, SB126.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-42-19-18 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 18. (a) A person may not possess with intent to:
(1) violate this chapter; or
(2) commit an offense described in IC 35-48-4;
a hypodermic syringe or needle or an instrument adapted for the use of
a controlled substance or legend drug by injection in a human being.
(b) A person who violates subsection (a) commits a Level 6 felony.
SECTION 2. IC 35-52-16-88.7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 88.7. IC 16-42-19-18 defines a crime concerning
injection devices.
2026 IN 126—LS 6402/DI 106